Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB238.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1.
KANSAS PUBLIC EMPLOYEES
RETIREMENT SYSTEM
(a) There is appropriated for the above agency from the state general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
Cost-of-living adjustment payment..........................................$136,400,000
Provided, That all expenditures from the cost-of-living adjustment
payment account shall be made by the above agency for the purpose of
paying the actuarial cost to the retirement system for the cost-of-living
adjustment authorized by section 2, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 2. (a) The retirement benefit, pension or annuity payments
accruing after June 30, 2025, to each retirant shall be increased by a cost-
of-living adjustment in an amount as provided in subsection (b). Such
payments shall be paid by the retirement system to the retirant.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), each retirant who is
entitled to receive a retirement benefit, pension or annuity payment from
the retirement system on July 1, 2025, shall have such retirement benefit,
pension or annuity increased in accordance with the following schedule.
For those retirants whose date of retirement is:
(A) On or before July 1, 2015, such benefit, pension or annuity
payment shall be increased 1% of the retirement benefit, pension or
annuity payment in effect on July 1, 2025;
(B) on or before July 1, 2011, such benefit, pension or annuity
payment shall be increased 2% of the retirement benefit, pension or
annuity payment in effect on July 1, 2025;
(C) on or before July 1, 2007, such benefit, pension or annuity
payment shall be increased 3% of the retirement benefit, pension or
annuity payment in effect on July 1, 2025;
(D) on or before July 1, 2003, such benefit, pension or annuity

SB 238 2
payment shall be increased 4% of the retirement benefit, pension or
annuity payment in effect on July 1, 2025; and
(E) on or before July 1, 1999, such benefit, pension or annuity
payment shall be increased 5% of the retirement benefit, pension or
annuity payment in effect on July 1, 2025.
(2) In no event shall the increase in the monthly benefit amount
provided by this subsection exceed $100.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) "Insured disability benefit recipient" means any person who is a
member or special member of the retirement system pursuant to the
provisions of K.S.A. 74-4911 or 74-49,203, and and amendments thereto,
and receiving an insured disability benefit under K.S.A. 74-4927, and
amendments thereto;
(2) "retirement system" means the Kansas public employees
retirement system; and
(3) "retirant" means any:
(A) Person who is a member or special member of the retirement
system pursuant to the provisions of K.S.A. 74-4911 or 74-49,203, and
amendments thereto, and who has been retired for at least 10 years;
(B) person who is a joint annuitant or beneficiary of any member
described in subparagraph (A); and
(C) insured disability benefit recipient.
(e) This section shall be a part of and supplemental to K.S.A. 74-4901
et seq., and amendments thereto.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.